New York, session 2025-2026, S5004.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 203 of the education law is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 § 203. Officers. 1. The elective officers of the university shall be 4 a chancellor and a vice-chancellor who shall serve without salary, and 5 such other officers as are deemed necessary by the regents, all of whom 6 shall be chosen by ballot by the regents and shall hold office during 7 their pleasure; but no election, removal or change of salary of an elec- 8 tive officer shall be made by less than six votes in favor thereof. Each 9 regent and each elective officer shall, before entering on [his] their 10 duties, take and file with the secretary of state the oath of office 11 required of state officers, and prove that their primary residence is 12 located within New York state. 13 2. The chancellor shall preside at all convocations and at all meet- 14 ings of the regents, and confer all degrees which they shall authorize. 15 In [his] the chancellor's absence or inability to act, the vice-chancel- 16 lor, or if [he] the vice-chancellor be also absent, the senior regent 17 present, shall perform all the duties and have all the powers of the 18 chancellor. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09635-01-5